Maryland, session 2025, HB1313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1313*

HOUSE BILL 1313
3–8A–30.1.
(A) IT IS UNLAWFUL FOR A PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A STUDENT IN A
PUBLIC SCHOOL, AFTER RECEIVING NOTICE UNDER § 7–304.2 OF THE EDUCATION
ARTICLE OF THE PARENT’S OR GUARDIAN’S CHILD’S VIOLENT AND DISRUPTIVE
BEHAVIOR ON SCHOOL PREMISES OR DURING SCHOOL–RELATED ACTIVITIES, TO
FAIL TO SEEK AND PARTICIPATE IN COUNSELING WITH THE PARENT’S OR
GUARDIAN’S CHILD.
(B) A PARENT OR GUARDIAN CONVICTED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE
ORDERED BY THE COURT TO PERFORM COMMUNITY SERVICE AS DETERMINED BY
THE COURT.
Article – Education
7–304.2.
(A) (1) IF A STUDENT IN A PUBLIC SCHOOL ENGAGES IN TWO OR MORE
INCIDENTS OF VIOLENT AND DISRUPTIVE BEHAVIOR ON SCHOOL PREMISES OR
DURING SCHOOL–RELATED ACTIVITIES DURING A SCHOOL YEAR, THE SCHOOL
PRINCIPAL SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF THE
STUDENT REGARDING THE STUDENT’S BEHAVIOR.
(2) THE WRITTEN NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL ADDITIONALLY:
(I) REQUIRE THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF THE STUDENT TO
SEEK AND PARTICIPATE IN COUNSELING WITH THE STUDENT;
(II) ADVISE THAT FAILURE TO SEEK AND PARTICIPATE IN
COUNSELING WITH THE STUDENT IS UNLAWFUL UNDER § 3–8A–30.1 OF THE
COURTS ARTICLE AND HAS POTENTIAL CONSEQUENCES;
(III) INCLUDE REFERRALS TO COMMUNITY RESOURCES AND
OTHER APPROPRIATE COUNSELING SERVICES; AND
(IV) INCLUDE INFORMATION REGARDING ANY PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED BY THE COUNTY BOARD UNDER § 7–304 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A STUDENT’S PARENT OR GUARDIAN WHO RECEIVES NOTICE UNDER
THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF § 3–8A–30.1 OF THE COURTS
ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 1313 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.